Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
For any insurance policy, certificate, or contract that provides coverage for the
replacement of roofing materials, the insurer shall, when uniformity of appearance
cannot be achieved due to the age, condition, or discontinued manufacture of the
existing roofing materials:
(1) Replace the roofing materials on the entire roof at no cost to the insured, except
for any applicable deductible; and
(2) Not apply any line-of-sight rule to exclude coverage for the replacement of
roofing materials for any portion of the roof.
Section 2. This Act applies to insurance policies, certificates, and contracts
issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/3/2025 4:13 PM Jacketed